Arkansas, session 2025, HB1600.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-52-105 is amended to read as follows:
14-52-105. Holiday compensation.
(a) All full-time law enforcement officers regardless of their titles,
such as city marshal, employed by cities of the first or second class or
incorporated towns shall be compensated for all legal holidays established by
the governing body of the municipality.
(b) This compensation Compensation under subsection (a) of this
section shall be based on the full-time law enforcement officer's daily rate
of pay and in addition to the regular pay schedule.
(c) This compensation Compensation under subsection (a) of this
section may be included within the full-time law enforcement officer's base
pay.
(d) This compensation Compensation under subsection (a) of this
*SSS187*
03-04-2025 09:53:28 SSS187

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1600
section shall be prorated and paid during the regular payroll periods or paid
in one (1) lump sum annually on a date in December designated by the
municipality.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-52-106 is amended to read as follows:
14-52-106. Annual vacation leave.
(a) The head or chief of each police department shall:
(1) Grant each full-time employee annual vacation leave of not
less than fifteen (15) working days with full pay; and
(2) Approve the use of annual vacation leave before the annual
vacation leave is used.
(b) Unused annual vacation leave may accumulate to a maximum allowance
as determined by ordinance of the municipality.
(c) Upon the first day after the end of the term of service or
retirement, an a full-time employee who has accumulated vacation time under
this section may be paid for his or her unused accumulated vacation leave at
the full-time employee's regular rate of pay, not to exceed the maximum
allowance under ordinance of the municipality.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 14-52-107 is amended to read as follows:
14-52-107. Uniform sick leave — Definition.
(a)(1)(A) From and after April 11, 1969, all full-time law enforcement
officers, regardless of their titles, such as city marshal, employed by
cities of the first and second class or incorporated towns shall accumulate
sick leave at the rate of twenty (20) working days per year beginning one (1)
year after the date of employment.
(B) As used in this section, “working day” shall be
defined by municipal ordinance.
(2) Unused sick leave shall accumulate to a maximum of sixty
(60) days unless the city or town by ordinance authorizes the accumulation of
a greater amount, except for the purpose of computing years of service for
retirement purposes.
(b)(1) In cities having sick leave provisions through ordinance, the
total sick leave accumulated by the individual full-time law enforcement
officer shall be credited to him or her and new days accumulated under the
provisions of this section until the maximum prescribed in subsection (a) of
03-04-2025 09:53:28 SSS187

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1600
this section is reached.
(2)(A) Time off may be charged against accumulated sick leave
only for such days that an a full-time law enforcement officer is scheduled
to work.
(B) No such sick leave as provided in this section shall
be charged against any a full-time law enforcement officer during any period
of sickness, illness, or injury for any days which the full-time law
enforcement officer is not scheduled to work.
(c)(1) If, at the end of his or her term of service, upon retirement
or death, whichever occurs first, any police a full-time law enforcement
officer has unused accumulated sick leave, he or she shall be paid for this
sick leave at the regular rate of pay in effect at the time of retirement or
death.
(2) Payment for unused sick leave in the case of a police full-
time law enforcement officer, upon retirement or death, shall not exceed
sixty (60) days salary unless the city, by ordinance, authorizes a greater
amount, but in no event to exceed ninety (90) days' salary.
(d)(1) A city of the first class, a city of the second class, and an
incorporated town may adopt a catastrophic leave program by ordinance under §
14-42-123 to include a “presumptive illness list for municipal police
department” under this section.
(2) As used in this section, a “presumptive illness list for municipal
police department” means an illness that is chronic or fatal.

/s/Tosh











03-04-2025 09:53:28 SSS187